Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1832
Office of public advocate; administration.

The office of the public advocate shall be located at the same location as the commission but shall be kept separate from the commission's other offices as provided by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The public advocate may hire or contract with attorneys, legal assistants, experts, consultants, secretaries, clerks, and such other staff necessary for the full and efficient discharge of the duties of the office as permitted by the budget of the public advocate as approved by the commission. The public advocate shall employ and supervise personnel as authorized by the budget approved by the commission. The employees of the public advocate shall not be supervised or directed by the commission. Funding for the office of public advocate shall be approved by the commission and collected through the assessment process as provided for in sections 66-1840 and 66-1841. The commission shall decide all matters of shared administrative and clerical personnel.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 32.